print/tex/TeX3.14/contrib/tex/hyphen/hyphen.polish.tex
% HYPHEN.POL
% Polish hyphenation patterns by Hanna Ko{\l}odziejska
% (made available for network distribution by J. S. Bie\'n,
%  Institute of Informatics, Warsaw University)
%
% The patterns use old Bie\'n's input conventions,
% i.e. @r means z with dot and @z means z with accent,
% e.g.
% P@ojd@z, ki@n-@re t@e chmurno@s@c w g@l@ab flaszy.
%                                 
% If the patterns are used with {\TeX} 3.x, the x- and -xx breaks
% should be disabled:
% \lefthyphenmin=2 \righthyphenmin=3
%
% The patterns were published in the report described below in the
% BibTeX format:
%
% @techreport{Kol87,
%             author = "Hanna Ko{\l}odziejska",
%             title = "Dzielenie wyraz\'ow polskich w systemie {\TeX}",
%             institution = "Instytut Informatyki Uniwersytetu Warszawskiego",
%             year = 1987,
%             type = "Sprawozdania IInf UW",
%             number = "nr.~165"
%             }
%
%% CharacterTable
%%   Upper-case    ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ
%%   Lower-case    abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz
%%   Digits        0123456789
%%   Exclamation   !     Double quote  "     Hash (number) #
%%   Dollar        $     Percent       %     Ampersand     &
%%   Acute accent  '     Left paren    (     Right paren   )
%%   Asterisk      *     Plus          +     Comma         ,
%%   Minus         -     Point         .     Solidus       /
%%   Colon         :     Semicolon     ;     Less than     <
%%   Equals        =     Greater than  >     Question mark ?
%%   Commercial at @     Left bracket  [     Backslash     \
%%   Right bracket ]     Circumflex    ^     Underscore    _
%%   Grave accent  `     Left brace    {     Vertical bar  |
%%   Right brace   }     Tilde         ~
%%
%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%
%                                                                       %
%   To jest  plik  WZORCE.TEX  zawierajacy  pelny zestaw  wzorcow       %
%   dzielenia  wyrazow  polskich,  ktory  moze  byc  wykorzystany       %
%   w systemie TeX  (zamiast  HYPHEN.TEX).                              %
%      Niniejsze  wzorce  moga  byc  przekazywane  (nieodplatnie)       %
%   wszystkim  zainteresowanym.                                         %
%                                                                       %
%                 Hanna Kolodziejska                                    %
%                 Instytut Informatyki Uniwersytetu Warszawskiego       %
%                                                                       %
%   1987-12-15                                                          %
%                                                                       %
%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%
\catcode`\@=11 \lccode`@=`@
\patterns{
%
  a1  e1  i1  o1  u1  y1 
%
  i2a   i2@a   i2e    i2@e  i2o   i2@o  i2u   i2y
%
  @4a   @4c    @4e    @4l   @4n   @4o   @4s   @4z    @4r
%
  d4z   d4@z   d4@r   c4z   r4z   s4z   c4h
%
  a2u  e2u
%
  e3u2sz       .na3u        .nie3u       .prze3u     .za3u       .za4uto
%
  .br4         .dr4         .kl4         .pl4        .skr4       .tr4  
  .brz4        .drz4        .kr4         .p@l4       .sm4        .trz4   
  .ch4         .dz4         .krz4        .prz4       .st4        .zm4   
  .chrz4       .d@z4        .@l4         .rz4        .str4       .zw4   
  .cz4         .d@r4        .mk4         .r@r4       .tch4       .@zd@z4   
  .@c4         .grz4        .pch4        .sch4       .tk4        .@r4   
%
%  PRZEDROSTKI ZAKO@NCZONE NA SP@O@LG@LOSK@E
%
  .ad3
            .ad4a        .ad4e        .ad5iu       .ad5op       .ad4u   
            .ad5apt      .ad4i        .ad4o        .ad5or       .ad4y 
  .be2z3
            .be3z4an     .be3z4ik     .bezzw2      .odbe2z3     .ubezw2
            .be3z4ec     .bezw2       .najbe2z3    .ube2z3               
  .de2z3   
            .de3z4abil   .de3z4awu    .de3z4el     .de3z4er     .de3z4y 
  .dy2s3 
            .dy3s4e      .dy3s4y      .zdy2s3kont  .zdy2s3kwal
            .dy3s4o      .dy3sz       .zdy2s3kred
  .dy2z3 
            .dy3z4e
  .eks3  
            .eks4y       .po3e2ks3    .pod3e4ks3   .wye2ks3 
  .hipe2r3    
            .hipe3r4o
  .in3     
            .in4f3lan    .in4o        .ino3w2      .zai2n3  
            .in4ic       .in5ok       .in4u        .zai3n4ic
  .kon2t2r3  
            .kon3tr4a    .kon4tr5akc  .kon4tr5ase  .kon3tr4ol  
            .kon4tr5adm  .kon4tr5alt  .kon4tr5asy  .kon3tr4ow
            .kon4tr5agi  .kon4tr5arg  .kon4tr5ata  .kon3tr4y
% .na2d2
            .na3d@a      .na3d@e      .na3dy
  .na2j 
            .na3j@a      .na3j@e      
  .pe2r3
            .pe3r4e      .pe3r4i      .pe3r4o      .pe3r4u      .pe3r4y
% .po2d2          
            .po3d@a      .po3dy
% .post
            .po4st3d     .po4st3h     .po4st3p     .po4st3s
  .przeci2w3
            .przeci3w4ie .przeciww2  
% .prze2d2
            .prze3d@a    .prze3d@e    .prze3dy
  .ro2z3 
            .ro3z4a      .ro4z5e4g3z  .roz@s2      .naj3ro2z3   .nieroz@s2 
            .ro4z5agi    .ro4z5emo    .ro3z4u      .najro3z4u   .niero3z4u
            .ro4z5anie   .ro4z5e4n3t               .niero2z3    .uro2z3 
            .rozbrz2     .rozm2                    .nierozbrz2  .zro2z3       
            .ro3z4e      .rozpo3w2                 .nierozm2    .zro3z4u
  .su2b3 
            .su3b4ie
  .supe2r3 
            .supe3r4at   .supe3r4io   .supero2d1rzut
  .@sr@o2d5
            .pod3@sr@o2d5
  .tra2n2s3 
            .tran3s4ep    .tran3s4y    .tran3sz     .przetra2n2s3
% .we3s2
            .we4st3f      .we4st3m
%
% PIERWSZE CZ@LONY Z@LO@RE@N (zako@nczone na sp@o@lg@losk@e)
%
  .cztere2ch3
  .czw@o2r3   .czw@o3r4a  .czw@o3r4@a  .czw@o3r4e  .czw@o3r4@e  .czw@o3r4o
  .@cwie2r@c3 
  .dw@o2j3    .dw@o3j4a   .dw@o3j4@a   .dw@o3j4e   .dw@o3j4@e   .dw@o3j4o
  .dziewi@e2@c3
  .kro2@c3
  .osie2m3
  .pi@e2@c3   
  .pi@e@cse2t3
  .p@o2@l3    .p@o3@l4@a   .p@o3@l4@e    .p@o3@l4y    .p@o3@l4ecz
  .siede2m3        
  .sp@o2@l3 
  .sze2s3
  .sze2@s2@c3
  .tr@o2j3    .tr@o3j4@a   .tr@o3j4@e    .tr@o3j4ecz
  .tysi@a2c3  .tysi@a3c4a  .tysi@a3c4e   .tysi@a3cz   
  .wewn@a2trz3
  .wieluse2t3
  .wsp@o2@l3  
  .wsze2ch3   .wszechw2
%
%  PIERWSZE CZ@LONY Z@LO@RE@N (zako@nczone na samog@losk@e)
%
  .auto3ch2                               .pierwo3w2
  .ca@lo3k2       .ca@lo3@s2              .pi@ecio3@s2
  .ciep@lo3kr2                            .piono3w2
  .cztero3@s2                             .p@lasko3w2
  .daleko3w2                              .pra3s2         .pra3w2n
  .d@lugo3tr2     .d@lugo3w2              .przed3si@e3w2
  .dziesi@ecio3@s2                        .siedmio3@s2
  .dziewi@ecio3@s2                        .sze@scio3@s2
  .jad@lo3w2                              .@swiat@lo3w2  
  .ko@lo3w2                               .wielo3k2       .wielo3@s2
  .kr@otko3tr2    .kr@otko3w2             .wniebo3w2
  .mo@rno3w2                              .wodo3w2
  .og@olno3k2                             .zimno3kr2
  .oka3m2                                 .z@lo3w2
  .o@smio3@s2
%
%  PRZEDROSTKI: DO- , NAJDO- , NIEDO-
%
  .do3b2   .najdo3b2   .niedo3b2   
  .dobr2   
  .dobrz2  
  .do3c2   .najdo3c2   .niedo3c2   
  .doch2   .najdoch2   .niedoch2   
  .docz2   .najdocz2   .niedocz2   
  .do3@c2  .najdo3@c2  .niedo3@c2  
  .do3d2   .najdo3d2   .niedo3d2   
  .dodz2   .najdodz2   .niedodz2   
  .dod@z2  .najdod@z2  .niedod@z2  
  .dod@r2  .najdod@r2  .niedod@r2  
  .do3f2   .najdo3f2   .niedo3f2   
  .do3g2   .najdo3g2   .niedo3g2   
  .dogrz2
  .do3h2   .najdo3h2   .niedo3h2   
  .do3k2   .najdo3k2   .niedo3k2   
                       .niedokr2
  .do3l2   .najdo3l2   .niedo3l2   
  .do3@l2  .najdo3@l2  .niedo3@l2  
  .do3m2   .najdo3m2   .niedo3m2   
  .domk2               .niedomk2   
  .do3n2   .najdo3n2   .niedo3n2   
  .do3@n2  .najdo3@n2  .niedo3@n2  
  .do3p2   .najdo3p2   .niedo3p2     
  .dopch2              .niedopch2
  .do3r2   .najdo3r2   .niedo3r2   
  .dorz2   .najdorz2   .niedorz2   
  .dor@r2  
  .do3s2   .najdo3s2   .niedo3s2   
  .dosm2   
  .dosz2   .najdosz2   .niedosz2   
  .do3@s2  .najdo3@s2  .niedo3@s2  
  .do3t2   .najdo3t2   .niedo3t2   
  .dotk2   .najdotk2   .niedotk2   
  .dotr2
  .do3w2   .najdo3w2   .niedo3w2   
  .do3z2   .najdo3z2   .niedo3z2   
  .do3@z2  .najdo3@z2  .niedo3@z2  
  .do3@r2  .najdo3@r2  .niedo3@r2  
%
%  PRZEDROSTKI: NA(D)- , PONA(D)-
%
  .na3b2               .pona3b2    
  .nabrz2              .ponabrz2     
  .na3c2   .nad3c2     .pona3c2     .ponad3c2
  .nach2   .nadch2     .ponach2     .ponad3ch2
  .nacz2   .nadcz2     .pona3cz2    .ponad3cz2
  .na3@c2  .nad3@c2    .pona3@c2    .ponad3@c2
  .na2d2   .nad3d2     .pona2d2     .ponad3d2
  .nadz2   .naddz2     .ponadz2     .ponad3dz2
  .nad@z2  .nadd@z2    .ponad@z2    .ponad3d@z2
  .nad@r2  .nadd@r2    .ponad@r2    .ponad3d@r2
  .na3f2   .nad3f2     .pona3f2     .ponad3f2
  .na3g2   .nad3g2     .pona3g2     .ponad3g2
  .nagrz2
  .na3h2   .nad3h2     .pona3h2     .ponad3h2
           .nad3j2                  .ponad3j2 
  .na3k2   .nad3k2     .pona3k2     .ponad3k2
  .nakr2
  .na3l2   .nad3l2     .pona3l2     .ponad3l2
  .na3@l2              .pona3@l2   
  .na3m2               .pona3m2    
  .na3n2   .nad3n2     .pona3n2     .ponad3n2
  .na3@n2  .nad3@n2    .pona3@n2    .ponad3@n2
  .na3p2   .nad3p2     .pona3p2     .ponad3p2
  .naprz2 
  .na3r2   .nadr2      .pona3r2     
  .na4r3r
  .narz2               .ponarz2    
  .nar@r2
  .na3s2   .nad3s2     .pona3s2     .ponad3s2
  .nasm2               .ponasm2
  .nasz2   .nadsz2     .ponasz2    
  .na3@s2  .nad3@s2    .pona3@s2    .ponad3@s2
  .na3t2   .nad3t2     .pona3t2     .ponad3t2
  .natch2
  .natk2  
  .na3w2   .nadw2      .pona3w2     
  .na3z2               .pona3z2     
  .naz3m2              .ponaz3m2 
  .nazw2               .ponazw2 
  .na3@z2              .pona3@z2   
  .na3@r2              .pona3@r2   
%
%  PRZEDROSTKI: NADE- , ODE- , PODE-
%
  .nade3b2   .ode3b2   .pode3b2   
  .nade3c2   .ode3c2   .pode3c2   
  .nadech2   .odech2   .podech2   
  .nadecz2   .odecz2   .podecz2   
  .nade3@c2  .ode3@c2  .pode3@c2  
  .nade3d2   .ode3d2   .pode3d2   
  .nadedz2   .odedz2   .podedz2   
  .naded@z2  .oded@z2  .poded@z2  
  .naded@r2  .oded@r2  .poded@r2  
  .nade3f2   .ode3f2   .pode3f2   
  .nade3g2   .ode3g2   .pode3g2   
  .nade3h2   .ode3h2   .pode3h2   
  .nade3k2   .ode3k2   .pode3k2   
  .nade3l2   .ode3l2   .pode3l2   
  .nade3@l2  .ode3@l2  .pode3@l2  
  .nade3m2   .ode3m2   .pode3m2   
             .ode3mk2  
  .nade3n2   .ode3n2   .pode3n2   
  .nade3@n2  .ode3@n2  .pode3@n2  
  .nade3p2   .ode3p2   .pode3p2   
             .odepch2  
  .nade3r2   .ode3r2   .pode3r2   
  .naderz2   .oderz2   .poderz2   
  .nader@r2  .oder@r2  .poder@r2  
  .nade3s2   .ode3s2   .pode3s2   
                       .podesch2  
  .nadesz2   .odesz2   .podesz2   
  .nade3@s2  .ode3@s2  .pode3@s2  
  .nade3t2   .ode3t2   .pode3t2   
             .odetch2
             .odetk2   .pode3tk2  
  .nade3w2   .ode3w2   .pode3w2   
  .nade3z2   .ode3z2   .pode3z2   
  .nade3@z2  .ode3@z2  .pode3@z2  
  .nade3@r2  .ode3@r2  .pode3@r2  
%
%  PRZEDROSTKI: NAJ- 
%
  .naj3b2                       .naj3k2                       .najsz2     
  .naj3c2                       .najkr2                       .naj3@s2    
  .najch2                       .naj3l2                       .naj3t2     
  .najcz2                       .naj3@l2                      .najtk2
  .naj3@c2                      .naj3m2                       .najtr2  
  .naj3d2                       .naj3n2                       .naj3w2     
  .najdz2                       .naj3@n2                      .naj3z2     
  .najd@z2                      .naj3p2                       .najzw2
  .najd@r2                      .naj3r2                       .naj3@z2    
  .naj3f2                       .najrz2                       .naj3@r2    
  .naj3g2                       .naj3s2     
  .naj3h2                       .najsm2
%
